Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-903
Platting; recording; city council; powers.

No plat or instruments effecting the subdivision of real property, described in section 16-902, shall be recorded or have any force and effect unless the same be approved by the city council of such city or by its agent designated pursuant to section 19-916. The city council of such city shall have power, by ordinance, to provide the manner, plan, or method by which real property in any such area may be subdivided, platted, or laid out, including a plan or system for the avenues, streets, or alleys to be laid out within or across the same; and to prohibit the sale or offering for sale of, and the construction of buildings and other improvements on, any lots or parts of real property not subdivided, platted, or laid out as required in sections 16-902 to 16-904, 19-916, 19-918, and 19-920.

Laws 1957, c. 28, § 2(2), p. 183;

Laws 1967, c. 66, § 5, p. 217;

Laws 1983, LB 71, § 3.

Act, of which this section was a part, sustained as constitutional. Schlientz v. City of North Platte, 172 Neb. 477, 110 N.W.2d 58 (1961).